Hawaii statutes.
[§480E-12] Criminal penalties. Any person who
violates section 480E-10 is guilty of a class C felony and, in addition to any
other penalties, shall be fined $10,000. [L 2012, c 183, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next